Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.903

Section captions—1988 c 145.

Section captions as used in this chapter do not constitute any part of the law.

[ 1988 c 145 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.